District of Columbia statutes.
5-1002

Attendance of witnesses — Wilful false swearing.

Any wilful false swearing on the part of any witness before any trial board mentioned in § 5-1001 as to any material fact shall be deemed perjury and shall be punished in the manner prescribed by law for such offense.

May 11, 1892, 27 Stat. 29, ch. 65, § 2
Feb. 20, 1896, 29 Stat. 10, ch. 25, § 2
Apr. 16, 1932, 47 Stat. 87, ch. 118, § 3
1973 Ed., § 4-602.
1981 Ed., § 4-802.
This section is referenced in § 6-902.
Insanitary buildings, condemnation, condemnation review board, see § 6-902.